Nevada, session 83, AB571.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Educator
Effectiveness budget account for administration of the statewide
surveys of educators on exit or transfer and regarding working
conditions the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,100,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $900,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Educator
Effectiveness budget account for transfer to the State Public Charter
School Authority created by NRS 388A.150 to offset a decrease in
federal grant funding the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,307,938
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,307,938
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Standards and
Instructional Support budget account for additional software
licenses for the Canvas learning management system the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $560,370
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $495,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Safe and
Respectful Learning budget account for development of custom
reports from the student information management system the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $50,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $50,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Safe and
Respectful Learning budget account for the implementation of the
multi-tiered system of supports framework and related training the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $3,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $3,000,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 6. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $35,000 for the
Office of the Superintendent budget account for a study of the
effectiveness of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
Sec. 7. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $35,200 for the
Standards and Instructional Support budget account for the State
Seal of Biliteracy Program established pursuant to NRS 388.591.
Sec. 8. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $10,843 for the
Standards and Instructional Support budget account for the State
Seal of STEM Program established pursuant to NRS 388.594 and
the State Seal of STEAM Program established pursuant to
NRS 388.597.
Sec. 9. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $12,765 for the
Standards and Instructional Support budget account for the State
Seal of Civics Program established pursuant to NRS 388.5933 and
the civic excellence designation program set forth in NRS 388.5937.
Sec. 10. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $218,948 for the
Assessments and Accountability budget account for the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
development and implementation of a new Nevada School
Performance Framework.
Sec. 11. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $348,000 for the
District Support Services budget account for grants to local
education agencies for financial and operational efficiency.
Sec. 12. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $30,000 for the
District Support Services budget account for the costs of a contract
to review and analyze the programs and policies of the Department.
Sec. 13. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $500,000 for the
Educator Effectiveness budget account for the costs of a contract to
conduct the gap analysis study described in subsection 1 of
NRS 385.920.
Sec. 14. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
sections 6 to 13, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
fund from which it was appropriated on or before September 17,
2027.
Sec. 15. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)